ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム > 屋外遊具: バウンスハウス関連用品; バウンスハウス; ブランコ; プレイテント・プレイトンネル; プレイハウス; ホッピング・ポゴスティック; 砂場; シーソー; すべり台; ジャンピングシューズ; 屋外遊具セット関連用品; 屋外遊具セット; トランポリン関連用品; トランポリン; 水遊び
ko: 장난감/게임 > 야외 놀이용품: 공기 주입식 놀이기구 부대용품; 공기 주입식 놀이기구; 그네; 놀이 텐트/터널; 장난감 집; 포고 스틱; 모래 놀이통; 시소; 미끄럼틀; 죽마; 그네/놀이터 세트 부대용품; 그네/놀이터 세트; 트램펄린 부대용품; 트램펄린; 물놀이 장비
bg-BG: Играчки и игри > Оборудване за игра на открито: Аксесоари за надуваеми батути; Надуваеми батути; Игрални люлки; Палатки за игра и тунели; Къщи за игра; Пого стикове; Пясъчници; Люлки тип „везна“; Пързалки; Кокили; Аксесоари за люлка и комплект за игра; Люлки и комплекти за игра; Аксесоари за батут; Батути; Оборудване за водни игри
th: ของเล่นและเกม > อุปกรณ์ของเล่นกลางแจ้ง: อุปกรณ์สำหรับบ้านลม; โครงสร้างเป่าลม; ชิงช้า; เต็นท์และอุโมงค์ของเล่น; บ้านของเล่น; ขากระโดด; กล่องทราย; ไม้กระดานหก; กระดานลื่น; ไม้ต่อขา; ชุดชิงช้าและอุปกรณ์เครื่องเล่น; ชุดชิงช้าและเครื่องเล่น; อุปกรณ์แทรมโพลีน; แทรมโพลีน; อุปกรณ์เล่นน้ำ
pt-PT: Brinquedos e jogos > Equipamentos para brincar no exterior: Acessórios de insufláveis; Insufláveis; Baloiços de brincar; Túneis e tendas de brincar; Casas de brincar; Saltitões; Caixas de areia; Balancés; Escorregas; Andas; Acessórios para conjuntos de recreio e baloiços; Conjuntos de recreio e baloiços; Acessórios para trampolins; Trampolins; Equipamentos para brincar com água
fi: Lelut ja pelit > Ulkopelitarvikkeet: Pomppulinnojen lisätarvikkeet; Pomppulinnat; Keinut; Leikkiteltat ja -tunnelit; Leikkimökit; Hyppykepit; Hiekkalaatikot; Keinulaudat; Liukumäet; Puujalat; Keinu- ja leikkisettien lisätarvikkeet; Keinu- ja leikkisetit; Trampoliinien lisätarvikkeet; Trampoliinit; Vesileikkitarvikkeet
cs: Hračky a hry > Venkovní hračky: Příslušenství ke skákacím hradům; Skákací hrady; Houpačky; Stany na hraní a prolézací tunely; Dětské domečky; Skákadla pogo; Pískoviště; Pákové houpačky; Skluzavky; Skákací chůdy; Houpačky a dětská hřiště – příslušenství; Houpačky a dětská hřiště; Trampolíny – příslušenství; Trampolíny; Vybavení na vodní hry
el: Παιχνίδια > Εξοπλισμός παιχνιδιού εξωτερικού χώρου: Αξεσουάρ φουσκωτών αναπηδήσεων; Φουσκωτές αναπηδήσεις; Κούνιες παιχνιδιού; Σκηνές & τούνελ παιχνιδιού; Παιχνιδόσπιτα; Σκαρφαλώματα; Παιδότοποι με άμμο; Τραμπάλες; Τσουλήθρες; Ξυλοπόδαρα; Αξεσουάρ σετ κούνιας & παιδότοπων; Σετ κούνιας & παιδότοποι; Αξεσουάρ τραμπολίνου; Τραμπολίνα; Εξοπλισμός παιχνιδιών με νερό
nl: Speelgoed en spellen > Apparaten voor buiten spelen: Accessoires voor springkastelen; Springkussens; Schommels en glijbanen; Speeltenten en -tunnels; Speelhuizen; Pogosticks; Zandbakken; Wippen; Glijbaan; Springstelten; Accessoires voor schommel- en speelsets; Schommel- en speelsets; Trampolineaccessoires; Trampolines; Waterspeelgoed
hr-HR: Igračke i igre > Oprema za igru na otvorenom: Dodaci za napuhance; Napuhanci; Ljuljačke za igru; Šatori i tuneli za igru; Kućice za igru; Pogo palice; Pješčanici; Klackalice; Tobogani; Stupovi za igru; Dodaci za ljuljačke i setove za igru; Ljuljačke i setovi za igru; Pribor za trampolin; Trampolini; Oprema za igru u vodi
nb: Leker og spill > Utstyr for utendørsleker: Tilbehør til oppblåsbare hoppeslott; Oppblåsbare hoppeslott; Lekehusker; Leketelt og -tunneler; Lekehus; Hoppestokker; Sandkasser; Dumphusker; Sklier; Stylter; Tilbehør til huskesett og lekesett; Huskesett og lekesett; Tilbehør til trampoliner; Trampoliner; Utstyr for vannleker
en: Toys & Games > Outdoor Play Equipment: Inflatable Bouncer Accessories; Inflatable Bouncers; Play Swings; Play Tents & Tunnels; Playhouses; Pogo Sticks; Sandboxes; See Saws; Slides; Stilts; Swing Set & Playset Accessories; Swing Sets & Playsets; Trampoline Accessories; Trampolines; Water Play Equipment
it: Giochi e giocattoli > Attrezzatura gioco outdoor: Accessori per strutture gonfiabili da salto; Strutture gonfiabili da salto; Altalene e dondoli; Tende e tunnel giocattolo; Playhouse; Trampoli con molla; Sandbox; Altalene basculanti; Piani inclinati; Trampoli da salto; Set altalena e accessori per set di gioco; Set altalena e set di gioco; Accessori trampolini; Trampolini; Attrezzature per gioco in acqua
sl-SI: Igrače in igre > Oprema za igro na prostem: Dodatki za napihljiva igrala; Napihljiva igrala; Otroške gugalnice; Igralni šotori in tuneli; Otroške hiške; Pogo palice; Peskovniki; Gugalnice prevesnice; Tobogani; Hodulje; Dodatki za gugalnice in igralne komplete; Gugalnice in igralni kompleti; Dodatki za trampoline; Trampolini; Oprema za vodne igre
de: Spielzeuge & Spiele > Spielzeug für draußen: Hüpfburg-Zubehör; Hüpfburgen; Schaukeln; Spielzelte & -tunnel; Spielhäuser; Springstöcke; Sandkästen; Wippen; Rutschen; Stelzen; Zubehör für Schaukeln & Spielplatzgeräte; Schaukeln & Spielplatzgeräte; Trampolinzubehör; Trampoline; Wasserspielgeräte
fr: Jeux et jouets > Jeux de plein air: Accessoires pour structures gonflables; Structures gonflables; Balançoires; Tentes et tunnels d'activités; Maisonnettes et tentes de jeu; Bâtons sauteurs; Bacs à sable; Balançoires à bascule; Toboggans; Échasses; Accessoires pour balançoires et portiques; Balançoires et portiques; Accessoires de trampolines; Trampolines; Accessoires pour jeux d'eau
vi: Đồ chơi & Trò chơi > Thiết bị chơi ngoài trời: Phụ kiện nhà hơi; Bóng nẩy; Ghế đu; Lều và hầm đồ chơi; Nhà chơi cho bé; Gậy nhún; Hộp cát; Bập bênh; Cầu trượt; Cà kheo; Phụ kiện bộ xích đu và khung chơi ngoài trời; Khung chơi và bộ xích đu ngoài trời; Phụ kiện bạt nhún lò xo; Sàn nhún; Dụng cụ chơi nước
pt-BR: Brinquedos e jogos > Equipamento para brincadeiras ao ar livre: Acessórios para brinquedos infláveis; Castelos infláveis; Balanços; Tendas e túneis de brinquedo; Casas de brinquedo; Bastões pula-pula; Caixas de areia; Gangorras; Escorregadores; Varas para salto; Acessórios para balanços e brinquedos ao ar livre; Conjuntos de balanços e brinquedos ao ar livre; Acessórios para trampolim; Camas elásticas; Equipamento para brincadeiras na água
pl: Gry i zabawki > Zabawki ogrodowe: Akcesoria do zamków dmuchanych; Zamki dmuchane; Huśtawki i bujaki; Namioty i tunele dla dzieci; Domki do zabawy; Drążki pogo; Piaskownice; Huśtawki; Zjeżdżalnie; Szczudła sprężynowe; Akcesoria do huśtawek i placów zabaw; Zestawy huśtawek i placów zabaw; Akcesoria do trampolin; Trampoliny; Zabawki do wody
lt-LT: Žaislai ir žaidimai > Lauko žaidimų įranga: Pripučiamų batutų priedai; Pripučiami batutai; Žaislinės supynės; Žaislinės palapinės ir tuneliai; Žaidimų nameliai; Pogo lazdos; Smėlio dėžės; Gulsčios supynės; Čiuožyklos; Kojūkai; Sūpynių rinkinių ir žaidimų rinkinių priedai; Sūpynių rinkiniai ir žaidimų rinkiniai; Batutų priedai; Batutai; Vandens žaidimų įranga
zh-TW: 玩具和遊戲 > 戶外遊戲器具: 充氣跳床配件; 充氣彈跳床; 鞦韆; 遊戲帳篷和隧道; 遊戲屋; 彈跳桿; 沙箱; 蹺蹺板; 滑梯; 高蹺; 室外鞦韆/遊樂設施組配件; 室外鞦韆組/遊樂設施組; 彈跳床配件; 彈跳床; 戲水配備
es: Juegos y juguetes > Estructuras para juegos al aire libre: Accesorios para castillos hinchables; Castillos hinchables; Columpios y balancines; Tiendas y túneles de juego; Casitas infantiles; Saltadores; Cajones de arena; Subibajas; Toboganes; Zancos de salto; Accesorios para columpios y estructuras de juegos; Columpios y estructuras de juegos; Accesorios para camas elásticas; Camas elásticas; Equipos para juegos acuáticos
sk-SK: Hračky a hry > Vybavenie na exteriérové hry: Príslušenstvo k nafukovacím odrážadlám; Nafukovacie odrážadlá; Hracie hojdačky; Hracie stany a tunely; Domčeky na hranie; Skákacie tyče; Pieskoviská; Vahadlové hojdačky; Šmýkačky; Chodúle; Hojdačky a príslušenstvo k hracím súpravám; Hojdačky a hracie súpravy; Príslušenstvo k trampolínam; Trampolíny; Vybavenie na vodné hry
ru: Игрушки и игры > Инвентарь для игр на открытом воздухе: Аксессуары для надувных батутов; Надувные батуты; Качели; Игровые палатки и туннели; Игровые домики; Пого-стики; Песочницы; Качели-балансиры; Горки; Столбики с подножками; Аксессуары для качелей и детских городков; Качели и детские городки; Аксессуары для батутов; Батуты; Инвентарь для игр с водой
hu: Játékok és játékszerek > Szabadtéri játékfelszerelések: Felfújhatókidobó-kiegészítők; Felfújható kidobók; Játszóhinták; Játszósátrak és -alagutak; Játszóházak; Ugrálóbotok; Homokozók; Mérleghinták; Csúszdák; Gólyalábasok; Hintakészlet- és játékkészlet-kiegészítők; Hintakészletek és játékkészletek; Trambulinkiegészítők; Trambulinok; Vízi játékfelszerelés
zh-CN: 玩具/游戏 > 室外玩具设备: 充气蹦床配件; 充气跳床; 秋千; 玩具帐篷/隧道; 儿童游戏房; 弹簧单高跷; 沙盒; 翘翘板; 滑梯; 高跷; 秋千/滑梯/儿童游戏用配件; 秋千/滑梯/儿童游戏; 蹦床配件; 蹦床; 水上娱乐设备
da: Legetøj og spil > Udelegetøj: Tilbehør til hoppeborge; Hoppeborge; Gynger; Legetelte og -tunneller; Legehuse; Kængurustylter; Sandkasser; Vipper; Rutsjebaner; Hoppestylter; Gyngestativer og legestativer – tilbehør; Gyngestativer og legestativer; Tilbehør til trampoliner; Trampoliner; Vandleg – udstyr
sv: Leksaker och spel > Utrustning för utomhuslek: Hoppborgstillbehör; Hoppborgar; Gungor; Leksakstält och tunnlar; Lekstugor; Kängurustyltor; Sandlådor; Gungbrädor; Rutschkanor; Styltor; Tillbehör till gung- och lekplatssystem; Gung- och lekplatssystem; Tillbehör till studsmattor; Studsmattor; Utrustning för vattenlek
ro-RO: Jucării și jocuri > Echipamente pentru joacă în aer liber: Accesorii pentru căsuță gonflabilă; Căsuțe gonflabile; Scrâncioburi de joacă; Corturi și tuneluri pentru joacă; Căsuțe de joacă; Jucărie de sărit; Cutii cu nisip; Balansoare; Tobogane; Picioroange; Accesorii pentru set leagăn și set de joacă; Seturi leagăn și seturi de joacă; Accesorii pentru trambulină; Trambuline; Echipamente pentru joacă în apă
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar > Açık Hava Oyunu Ekipmanları: Şişme Ev Aksesuarları; Şişme Evler; Salıncak Koltuklar; Oyuncak Çadır ve Tüneller; Oyun Evleri; Zıplama Sırıkları; Kum Havuzları; Tahterevalliler; Kaydıraklar; Zıplama Ayaklıkları; Salıncak Seti ve Oyun Seti; Salıncak Setleri ve Oyun Setleri; Trambolin Aksesuarları; Trambolinler; Su Oyunları Ekipmanları